Connecticut, session 2026, SB00410.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 3-122a of the 2026 supplement to the general
2 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
3 (Effective July 1, 2026):
4 (a) For purposes of this section:
5 (1) "Dependent child" means a child, whether by blood or adoption,
6 of a first responder who (A) is under the age of twenty-two and was
7 dependent on the earnings of such first responder at the time of such
8 first responder's death, provided a child shall not be considered
9 dependent if such child provides more than half of such child's own
10 support, is married or is legally adopted by another person, or (B) is any
11 age and is physically or mentally incapacitated and was dependent on
12 the earnings of such first responder at the time of such first responder's
13 death.
sSB410 / File No. 308 1

sSB410 File No. 308
14 (2) "Emergency medical technician" has the same meaning as
15 provided in section 20-206jj.
16 (3) "Firefighter" has the same meaning as provided in section 7-313g.
17 (4) "Firefighter cancer death" means the death of a firefighter who (A)
18 was diagnosed with any condition of cancer affecting the skin, brain,
19 skeletal system, digestive system, endocrine system, respiratory system,
20 lymphatic system, reproductive system, urinary system or
21 hematological system resulting in such firefighter's death, and (B)
22 would be entitled to compensation or benefits pursuant to section 7-
23 313p.
24 [(4)] (5) "First responder" means an emergency medical technician,
25 firefighter, paramedic or police officer.
26 [(5)] (6) "Killed in the line of duty" means the death of a first
27 responder while engaged in the performance of such first responder's
28 duties, resulting from an incident, an accident or violence that caused
29 such death or caused injuries that were the direct or proximate cause of
30 such first responder's death, including any (A) death that is determined
31 to be occupationally related by a workers' compensation insurance
32 carrier, an employer to whom a certificate of self-insurance has been
33 issued pursuant to section 31-248 or an administrative law judge for
34 workers' compensation purposes under chapter 568, and (B) firefighter
35 cancer death. "Killed in the line of duty" does not include the death of a
36 first responder through such first responder's own wanton or wilful act.
37 [(6)] (7) "Paramedic" has the same meaning as provided in section 20-
38 206jj.
39 [(7)] (8) "Police officer" has the same meaning as provided in section
40 7-294a.
41 [(8)] (9) "Surviving family" means any person who is a surviving
42 spouse, surviving dependent child, surviving child who is not a
43 dependent child or surviving parent of a first responder killed in the line
44 of duty, or a surviving individual listed on such first responder's most
sSB410 / File No. 308 2

sSB410 File No. 308
45 recent beneficiary form on file with such first responder's employer.
46 (b) (1) There is established a fund to be known as the "Fallen Hero
47 Fund", which shall be a separate, nonlapsing fund. The fund may
48 contain any moneys required by law to be deposited in the fund. [and
49 shall be held by the Treasurer separate and apart from all other moneys,
50 funds and accounts.] The interest derived from the investment of the
51 fund shall be credited to the fund. [Amounts] Except as provided in
52 subdivision (2) of this subsection, amounts in the fund may be expended
53 by the Comptroller for purposes of payments pursuant to subsection (c)
54 of this section and reimbursement of municipalities pursuant to
55 subdivision (2) of subsection (c) of section 3-123eee, as amended by this
56 act. [Any balance remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall
57 be carried forward in the fund for the fiscal year next succeeding.]
58 (2) Any payment made pursuant to subsection (c) of this section or
59 reimbursement provided to a municipality pursuant to subdivision (2)
60 of subsection (c) of section 3-123eee, as amended by this act, due to a
61 firefighter cancer death shall be paid from the firefighters cancer relief
62 account established pursuant to section 7-313h.
63 (c) (1) After receiving notice, in a form and manner as determined by
64 the Comptroller, from an individual who is a member of the surviving
65 family of a first responder who was killed in the line of duty, the
66 Comptroller shall pay, within available appropriations, a lump sum
67 death benefit totaling one hundred thousand dollars from the fund
68 established [in] pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this
69 section to such surviving family, in accordance with regulations
70 adopted pursuant to subsection (e) of this section, provided the
71 surviving family of a first responder killed in the line of duty shall not
72 receive more than one such lump sum death benefit. Payments shall be
73 made to surviving families in the order in which notices are received
74 until the amount in such fund is depleted.
75 (2) Any payment made pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
76 shall be in addition to any other benefits for which individuals of such
77 first responder's surviving family are eligible and such payments shall
sSB410 / File No. 308 3

sSB410 File No. 308
78 not be reduced or offset due to any other benefits, including, but not
79 limited to, workers' compensation or other survivor benefits.
80 (3) Any person who would be entitled to compensation or benefits
81 pursuant to section 7-313p on or after October 1, 2023, due to a
82 firefighter cancer death shall be entitled to payment pursuant to
83 subdivision (1) of this subsection, provided such person otherwise
84 satisfies all requirements of this section necessary to receive such
85 payment.
86 (d) Not later than July 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the
87 Comptroller shall submit a report, in accordance with the provisions of
88 section 11-4a, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
89 having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and security. Such
90 report shall include a list of all expenditures made from the fund
91 established [by] pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of this
92 section during the prior year and from the firefighters cancer relief
93 account established pursuant to section 7-313h, the current balance of
94 such fund and account and information regarding additional amounts
95 needed for such fund or account.
96 (e) The Comptroller shall adopt regulations in accordance with the
97 provisions of chapter 54 to implement the provisions of this section,
98 including, but not limited to, application procedures and criteria for
99 awarding grants among individuals who are members of the surviving
100 family, with priority given to awards that would benefit a dependent
101 child or children and a spouse who is a member of the surviving family.
102 The Comptroller may implement policies and procedures necessary to
103 implement the provisions of this section while in the process of adopting
104 such regulations, provided notice of intent to adopt such regulations is
105 published on the eRegulations System not later than twenty days after
106 the date of implementation of such policies and procedures. Any
107 policies and procedures implemented under this subsection shall be
108 valid until the time such regulations are adopted.
109 Sec. 2. Section 3-123aaa of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
110 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective July
sSB410 / File No. 308 4

sSB410 File No. 308
111 1, 2026):
112 As used in this section and sections 3-123bbb to 3-123hhh, inclusive:
113 (1) "Firefighter cancer death" has the same meaning as provided in
114 section 3-122a, as amended by this act.
115 [(1)] (2) "First responder" has the same meaning as provided in
116 section 3-122a, as amended by this act. [;]
117 [(2)] (3) "Health Care Cost Containment Committee" means the
118 committee established in accordance with the ratified agreement
119 between the state and the State Employees Bargaining Agent Coalition
120 pursuant to subsection (f) of section 5-278.
121 [(3)] (4) "Killed in the line of duty" has the same meaning as provided
122 in section 3-122a, as amended by this act.
123 [(4)] (5) "Nonprofit employee" means any employee of a nonprofit
124 employer.
125 [(5)] (6) "Nonprofit employer" means (A) a nonprofit corporation,
126 organized under 26 USC 501, as amended from time to time, that (i) has
127 a purchase of service contract, as defined in section 4-70b, or (ii) receives
128 fifty per cent or more of its gross annual revenue from grants or funding
129 from the state, the federal government or a municipality or any
130 combination thereof, or (B) an organization that is tax exempt pursuant
131 to 26 USC 501(c)(5), as amended from time to time.
132 [(6)] (7) "Nonstate public employee" means any employee or elected
133 officer of a nonstate public employer.
134 [(7)] (8) "Nonstate public employer" means a municipality or other
135 political subdivision of the state, including a board of education, quasi-
136 public agency or public library. A municipality and a board of education
137 may be considered separate employers.
138 [(8)] (9) "Partnership plan" means a health care benefit plan offered
139 by the Comptroller to (A) nonstate public employers or nonprofit
sSB410 / File No. 308 5

sSB410 File No. 308
140 employers pursuant to section 3-123bbb, (B) graduate assistants at The
141 University of Connecticut and The University of Connecticut Health
142 Center, (C) postdoctoral trainees at The University of Connecticut and
143 The University of Connecticut Health Center, (D) graduate fellows at
144 The University of Connecticut and The University of Connecticut
145 Health Center, and (E) graduate students of The University of
146 Connecticut participating in university-funded internships as part of
147 their graduate program.
148 [(9)] (10) "State employee plan" means a self-insured group health
149 care benefits plan established under subsection (m) of section 5-259.
150 Sec. 3. Subsection (c) of section 3-123eee of the 2026 supplement to the
151 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
152 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
153 (c) (1) Each employer shall pay monthly the amount determined by
154 the Comptroller, pursuant to this section, for coverage of its employees
155 or its employees and retirees, as appropriate, under a partnership plan.
156 An employer may require each covered employee to contribute a
157 portion of the cost of such employee's coverage under the plan, subject
158 to any collective bargaining obligation applicable to such employer,
159 provided no contribution may be required of an individual receiving
160 coverage as described in subsection (i) of section 3-123bbb.
161 (2) An employer making payments pursuant to subdivision (1) of this
162 subsection for coverage under a partnership plan of an individual or
163 individuals described in subsection (i) of section 3-123bbb shall be
164 reimbursed by the Comptroller for the total cost of such payments from
165 the Fallen Hero Fund established pursuant to subsection (b) of section
166 3-122a, as amended by this act, except, if the reimbursement is due to a
167 firefighter cancer death, such reimbursement shall be reimbursed from
168 the firefighters cancer relief account established pursuant to section 7-
169 313h.
170 Sec. 4. Subsection (j) of section 10a-105 of the 2026 supplement to the
171 general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
sSB410 / File No. 308 6

sSB410 File No. 308
172 thereof (Effective July 1, 2026):
173 (j) Said board of trustees may provide health care coverage for
174 graduate assistants, postdoctoral trainees, graduate fellows and
175 graduate student interns identified in subdivision [(8)] (9) of section 3-
176 123aaa, as amended by this act, by enrolling such individuals in a
177 partnership plan as defined in section 3-123aaa, as amended by this act.
178 All premiums and expenses resulting from the participation of such
179 individuals in the partnership plan shall be paid by the university. No
180 such premiums or expenses shall be charged to the General Fund.
181 Sec. 5. (Effective July 1, 2026) Not later than October 1, 2026, the State
182 Fire Marshal shall establish a one-year pilot program to reimburse
183 firefighters, as defined in section 7-313g of the general statutes, who
184 receive screening for cancers common to firefighters. The State Fire
185 Marshal shall consult with a nonprofit organization with expertise in the
186 field of cancer screening to determine which cancer screenings shall
187 qualify for reimbursement pursuant to the pilot program. The pilot
188 program shall be operated in one municipality with a population that is
189 serviced by a volunteer fire department and one municipality with a
190 population that is serviced by a paid fire department. On and after the
191 effective date of this section, the State Fire Marshal shall accept
192 applications from municipalities for participation in the pilot program,
193 in a form and manner prescribed by the State Fire Marshal. Not later
194 than January 1, 2028, the State Fire Marshal shall submit a report on the
195 results of the pilot program, including any recommendations for
196 continuation or expansion of the pilot program, to the joint standing
197 committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
198 relating to public safety and security, in accordance with the provisions
199 of section 11-4a of the general statutes.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 3-122a
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 3-123aaa
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 3-123eee(c)
sSB410 / File No. 308 7

sSB410 File No. 308
Sec. 4 July 1, 2026 10a-105(j)
Sec. 5 July 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 5, "Effective from passage" was changed to "Effective July 1, 2026"
for consistency with standard drafting conventions.
PS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB410 / File No. 308 8

sSB410 File No. 308
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Admin. Serv., Dept. GF - Cost 280,000 205,000
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 92,000 69,000
Benefits1
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which establishes a pilot program to reimburse firefighters
receiving cancer screenings, results in an estimated General Fund cost
of $372,000 in FY 27 and at least $274,000 in FY 28. The bill also provides
the surviving family of a firefighter who has died from certain types of
cancer a lump sum death benefit and health insurance coverage. The
cost of providing these benefits will be paid out of the Firefighters
Cancer Relief Account2. It is expected that the account’s current balance
and annual deposits will be sufficient to fund any additional costs
resulting from this bill.
Section 1, which provides a lump sum death benefit totaling $100,000
to a surviving family member or beneficiary for firefighters who have
died from certain types of cancers, results in a potential cost to the
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
2 The Firefighters Cancer Relief Account is a separate non-lapsing account within the
Department of Administrative Services. The account generally receives funds through
state appropriations and investment income. The accounts current balance is
$8,770,081.
sSB410 / File No. 308 9

sSB410 File No. 308
Firefighters Cancer Relief Account dependent on the frequency of
qualifying cases.
Sections 2-3, which extend health insurance coverage under the state
partnership plan to a surviving family of firefighters who have died
from certain types of cancers, results in a net neutral fiscal impact to the
state or municipalities facilitating coverage as the payments will be
reimbursed by the Firefighters Cancer Relief Account. The cost to the
Firefighters Cancer Relief Account is estimated to be $44,000 per year
per surviving family.
Section 5 requires the State Fire Marshal within the Department of
Administrative Services (DAS) to create a pilot program, beginning
October 1, 2026, and ending January 1, 2028, to reimburse firefighters
who undergo cancer screening. This will require DAS to hire two new
employees to administer the program resulting in salary and fringe
costs of $312,000 in FY 27 and at least $234,000 in FY 28. In addition,
reimbursements to firefighters taking part in the pilot program may cost
up to $60,000 in FY 27 and up to $40,000 in FY 28. Reimbursement costs
may vary significantly depending upon the types of screening tests
covered and the firefighters chosen to participate in the program.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified in sections 2-3 above
would continue into the future subject to inflation.
sSB410 / File No. 308 10

sSB410 File No. 308
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 410
AN ACT CONCERNING FIREFIGHTER CANCER.